Illinois, session 104th, SB1584.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 521B-120 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/21B-120 new)7    Sec. 21B-120. Short-Term Approval credential. 8    (a) As used in this Section, "serious health condition" 9has the same meaning as set forth in the federal Family and 10Medical Leave Act of 1993.11    (b) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 12State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, may develop, 13by rules, a credential valid for an individual to serve as an 14educator in a specific education area or grade range for a 15temporary period of time and upon meeting the conditions set 16forth in those rules. Such a credential shall be known as a 17Short-Term Approval. A Short-Term Approval may be issued on an 18existing educator license or may stand alone, as applicable to 19the particular Short-Term Approval.20    (c) A Short-Term Approval shall have an expiration date 21without the ability to renew. Before the expiration of an 22educator's Short-Term Approval, the educator must obtain a 23license or endorsement in the same specific education area or   SB1584 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 05031 LNS 15059 b1grade range as the Short-Term Approval. If the educator does 2not obtain the required license or endorsement in the specific 3education area or grade range and the Short-Term Approval 4expires, the educator is not eligible to continue serving as 5an educator in the specific education area or grade range.6    The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 7State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, may consider 8extending the expiration date of the educator's Short-Term 9Approval if the educator can demonstrate that a serious health 10condition inhibited the educator's ability to timely apply for 11and receive the license or endorsement for the specific 12education area or grade range for which the Short-Term 13Approval was issued. An educator may receive only one 14extension for each Short-Term Approval, and the extension must 15not exceed one year.